Utah statutes.
78A-2-214.   Collection of accounts receivable.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Accounts receivable" means any amount due the state from an entity for
which payment has not been received by the state agency that is servicing the
debt.
(b)  "Accounts receivable" includes unpaid fees, licenses, taxes, loans,
overpayments, fines, forfeitures, surcharges, costs, contracts, interest,
penalties, restitution to victims, third party claims, sale of goods, sale of
services, claims, and damages.
(2)  If the Department of Corrections does not have responsibility under
Subsection 77-18-1(9) for collecting an account receivable and if the Office
of State Debt Collection does not have responsibility under Subsection
63A-8-201(6), the district court shall collect the account receivable.
(3) (a)  In the juvenile court, monies collected by the court from past-due
accounts receivable may be used to offset system, administrative, legal, and
other costs of collection.
(b)  The juvenile court shall allocate monies collected above the cost of
collection on a pro rata basis to the various revenue types that generated the
accounts receivable.
(4)  The interest charge established by the Office of State Debt Collection
under Subsection 63A-8-201(4)(g)(iii) may not be assessed on an account
receivable subject to the postjudgment interest rate established by Section
15-1-4.
